test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-maniway_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - maniway - ok : # -m inanimate noun
     
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: naniway
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kaniway
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: waniway
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px3iSg: waniwayiyiw
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: naniwayinân
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kaniwayinaw
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kaniwayiwâw
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: waniwayiwâw
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px3iPl: waniwayiyiw
     
     maniway+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: naniwaya
     maniway+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kaniwaya
     maniway+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: waniwaya
     maniway+N+IN+Pl+Px3iSg: waniwayiyiwa
     maniway+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: naniwayinâna
     maniway+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kaniwayinawa
     maniway+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kaniwayiwâwa
     maniway+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: waniwayiwâwa
     maniway+N+IN+Pl+Px3iPl: waniwayiyiwa
